Florida, session 2026, SB440.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âSection 408.910, Florida Statutes, is amended to 31 read: 32 408.910âFlorida Employee Health Choices Program.â 33 (1)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âThe Legislature finds that a 34 significant number of employers and employees in the residents 35 of this state do not have adequate access to affordable, quality 36 health insurance that meets their needs care. The Legislature 37 further finds that individual coverage health reimbursement 38 arrangements offer a novel way for employers of any size to give 39 health care contributions directly to employees to empower them 40 to choose their own health plan in a broad marketplace based on 41 individual financial needs and health factors. The Legislature 42 further finds that increasing access to affordable, quality 43 health care through individual coverage health reimbursement 44 arrangements can be best accomplished by establishing a 45 competitive marketplace market for employees who receive 46 employer premium contributions through individual coverage 47 health reimbursement arrangements purchasing health insurance 48 and health services. It is therefore the intent of the 49 Legislature to create the Florida Employee Health Choices 50 Program to do the following: 51 (a)âExpand opportunities for employers and employees 52 Floridians to access purchase affordable health insurance in 53 this state and health services. 54 (b)âCreate a platform that streamlines the purchase of 55 individual coverage for employees enrolled in individual 56 coverage health reimbursement arrangements Preserve the benefits 57 of employment-sponsored insurance while easing the 58 administrative burden for employers who offer these benefits. 59 (c)âEnable individual choice in both the manner and amount 60 of health care purchased. 61 (d)âProvide for the purchase of individual, portable health 62 care coverage. 63 (e)âDisseminate information to employers and employees 64 about individual coverage health reimbursement arrangements 65 consumers on the price and quality of health services. 66 (f)âSponsor a competitive marketplace market that 67 stimulates product innovation, quality improvement, and 68 efficiency in the production and delivery of individual health 69 insurance plans to employees enrolled in individual coverage 70 health reimbursement arrangements health services. 71 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 72 (a)ââCorporationâ means the Florida Employee Health 73 Choices, Inc., established under this section. 74 (b)ââCorporationâs marketplaceâ means the single, 75 centralized market established by the program which that 76 facilitates the purchase of products made available in the 77 marketplace. 78 (c)ââHealth insurance agentâ means an agent licensed under 79 part IV of chapter 626. 80 (d)ââInsurerâ means an entity licensed under chapter 624 81 which offers an individual health insurance policy or a group 82 health insurance policy, a preferred provider organization as 83 defined in s. 627.6471, an exclusive provider organization as 84 defined in s. 627.6472, or a health maintenance organization 85 licensed under part I of chapter 641, or a prepaid limited 86 health service organization or discount plan organization 87 licensed under chapter 636. 88 (e)ââProgramâ means the Florida Employee Health Choices 89 Program established by this section. 90 (3)âPROGRAM PURPOSE AND COMPONENTS.âThe Florida Employee 91 Health Choices Program is created as a single, centralized 92 marketplace market for the sale and purchase of individual 93 health insurance plans by employees enrolled in an individual 94 coverage health reimbursement arrangement various products that 95 enable individuals to pay for health care. These products 96 include, but are not limited to, health insurance plans, health 97 maintenance organization plans, prepaid services, service 98 contracts, and flexible spending accounts. The components of the 99 program include: 100 (a)âEnrollment of employers. 101 (b)âAdministrative services for participating employers, 102 including: 103 1.âAssistance in seeking federal approval of cafeteria 104 plans. 105 2.âCollection of premiums and other payments. 106 3.âManagement of individual benefit accounts. 107 4.âDistribution of premiums to insurers and payments to 108 other eligible vendors. 109 5.âAssistance for participants in complying with reporting 110 requirements. 111 (c)âServices to individual participants, including: 112 1.âInformation about available products and participating 113 vendors. 114 2.âAssistance with assessing the benefits and limits of 115 each product, including information necessary to distinguish 116 between policies offering creditable coverage and other products 117 available through the program. 118 3.âAccount information to assist individual participants 119 with managing available resources. 120 4.âServices that promote healthy behaviors. 121 (d)âRecruitment of vendors, including insurers and, health 122 maintenance organizations, prepaid clinic service providers, 123 provider service networks, and other providers. 124 (e)âCertification of vendors to ensure capability, 125 reliability, and validity of offerings. 126 (f)âCollection of data, monitoring, assessment, and 127 reporting of vendor performance. 128 (g)âInformation services for individuals and employers. 129 (h)âProgram evaluation. 130 (4)âELIGIBILITY AND PARTICIPATION.âParticipation in the 131 program is voluntary and shall be available to employers, 132 individuals, vendors, and health insurance agents as specified 133 in this subsection. 134 (a)âEmployers eligible to enroll in the program include 135 those employers that meet criteria established by the 136 corporation and elect to make their employees eligible through 137 the program. 138 (b)âIndividuals eligible to participate in the program 139 include: 140 1.âIndividual employees of enrolled employers. 141 2.âOther individuals that meet criteria established by the 142 corporation. 143 (c)âEmployers who choose to participate in the program may 144 enroll by complying with the procedures established by the 145 corporation. The procedures must include, but are not limited 146 to: 147 1.âSubmission of required information. 148 2.âCompliance with federal tax requirements for the 149 establishment of a cafeteria plan, pursuant to s. 125 of the 150 Internal Revenue Code, including designation of the employerâs 151 plan as a premium payment plan, a salary reduction plan that has 152 flexible spending arrangements, or a salary reduction plan that 153 has a premium payment and flexible spending arrangements. 154 3.âDetermination of the employerâs contribution, if any, 155 per employee, provided that such contribution is equal for each 156 eligible employee. 157 4.âEstablishment of payroll deduction procedures, subject 158 to the agreement of each individual employee who voluntarily 159 participates in the program. 160 5.âDesignation of the corporation as the third-party 161 administrator for the employerâs health benefit plan. 162 6.âIdentification of eligible employees. 163 7.âArrangement for periodic payments. 164 8.âEmployer notification to employees of the intent to 165 transfer from an existing employee health plan to the program at 166 least 90 days before the transition. 167 (d)âAll eligible vendors who choose to participate and the 168 products and services that the vendors are permitted to sell are 169 as follows: 170 1.âInsurers licensed under chapter 624 may sell health 171 insurance policies, limited benefit policies, other risk-bearing 172 coverage, and other products or services. 173 2.âHealth maintenance organizations licensed under part I 174 of chapter 641 may sell health maintenance contracts, limited 175 benefit policies, other risk-bearing products, and other 176 products or services. 177 3.âPrepaid limited health service organizations may sell 178 products and services as authorized under part I of chapter 636, 179 and discount plan organizations may sell products and services 180 as authorized under part II of chapter 636. 181 4.âPrepaid health clinic service providers licensed under 182 part II of chapter 641 may sell prepaid service contracts and 183 other arrangements for a specified amount and type of health 184 services or treatments. 185 5.âHealth care providers, including hospitals and other 186 licensed health facilities, health care clinics, licensed health 187 professionals, pharmacies, and other licensed health care 188 providers, may sell service contracts and arrangements for a 189 specified amount and type of health services or treatments. 190 6.âProvider organizations, including service networks, 191 group practices, professional associations, and other 192 incorporated organizations of providers, may sell service 193 contracts and arrangements for a specified amount and type of 194 health services or treatments. 195 7.âCorporate entities providing specific health services in 196 accordance with applicable state law may sell service contracts 197 and arrangements for a specified amount and type of health 198 services or treatments. 199 200 A vendor described in subparagraphs 3.-7. may not sell products 201 that provide risk-bearing coverage unless that vendor is 202 authorized under a certificate of authority issued by the Office 203 of Insurance Regulation and is authorized to provide coverage in 204 the relevant geographic area. Otherwise Eligible vendors may be 205 excluded from participating in the program for deceptive or 206 predatory practices, financial insolvency, or failure to comply 207 with the terms of the participation agreement or other standards 208 set by the corporation. 209 (e)âEligible individuals may participate in the program 210 voluntarily. Individuals who join the program may participate by 211 complying with the procedures established by the corporation. 212 These procedures must include, but are not limited to: 213 1.âSubmission of required information. 214 2.âAuthorization for payroll deduction. 215 3.âCompliance with federal tax requirements. 216 4.âArrangements for payment. 217 5.âSelection of products and services. 218 (f)âVendors who choose to participate in the program may 219 enroll by complying with the procedures established by the 220 corporation. These procedures may include, but are not limited 221 to: 222 1.âSubmission of required information, including a complete 223 description of the coverage, services, provider network, payment 224 restrictions, and other requirements of each product offered 225 through the program. 226 2.âExecution of an agreement to comply with requirements 227 established by the corporation. 228 3.âExecution of an agreement that prohibits refusal to sell 229 any offered product or service to a participant who elects to 230 buy it. 231 4.âEstablishment of product prices based on applicable 232 criteria. 233 5.âArrangements for receiving payment for enrolled 234 participants. 235 5.6.âParticipation in ongoing reporting processes 236 established by the corporation. 237 6.7.âCompliance with grievance procedures established by 238 the corporation. 239 (g)âHealth insurance agents licensed under part IV of 240 chapter 626 are eligible to voluntarily participate as buyersâ 241 representatives. A buyerâs representative acts on behalf of an 242 individual purchasing health insurance and health services 243 through the program by providing information about products and 244 services available through the program and assisting the 245 individual with both the decision and the procedure of selecting 246 specific products. Serving as a buyerâs representative does not 247 constitute a conflict of interest with continuing 248 responsibilities as a health insurance agent if the relationship 249 between each agent and any participating vendor is disclosed 250 before advising an individual participant about the products and 251 services available through the program. In order to participate, 252 a health insurance agent shall comply with the procedures 253 established by the corporation, including: 254 1.âCompletion of training requirements. 255 2.âExecution of a participation agreement specifying the 256 terms and conditions of participation. 257 3.âDisclosure of any appointments to solicit insurance or 258 procure applications for vendors participating in the program. 259 4.âArrangements to receive payment from the corporation for 260 services as a buyerâs representative. 261 (5)âPRODUCTS.â 262 (a)âThe products that may be made available for purchase 263 through the program include, but are not limited to: 264 1.âhealth insurance policies and. 265 2.âhealth maintenance contracts. 266 3.âLimited benefit plans. 267 4.âPrepaid clinic services. 268 5.âService contracts. 269 6.âArrangements for purchase of specific amounts and types 270 of health services and treatments. 271 7.âFlexible spending accounts. 272 (b)âHealth insurance policies, health maintenance 273 contracts, limited benefit plans, prepaid service contracts, and 274 other contracts for services must ensure the availability of 275 covered services. 276 (c)âProducts may be offered for multiyear periods provided 277 the price of the product is specified for the entire period or 278 for each separately priced segment of the policy or contract. 279 (d)âThe corporation shall provide a disclosure form for 280 consumers to acknowledge their understanding of the nature of, 281 and any limitations to, the benefits provided by the products 282 and services being purchased by the consumer. 283 (e)âThe corporation must determine that making the plan 284 available through the program is in the interest of eligible 285 individuals and eligible employers in the state. 286 (6)âSURCHARGE PRICING.âPrices for the products and services 287 sold through the program must be transparent to participants and 288 established by the vendors. The corporation shall annually 289 assess a surcharge for each premium or price set by a 290 participating vendor. The surcharge may not be more than 2.5 291 percent of the price and must shall be used to generate funding 292 for administrative services provided by the corporation and 293 payments to buyersâ representatives. 294 (7)âTHE MARKETPLACE PROCESS.âThe program shall provide a 295 single, centralized marketplace market for access to purchase of 296 health insurance and, health maintenance contracts by an 297 employee enrolled in an individual coverage health reimbursement 298 arrangement, and other health products and services. Purchases 299 may be made by participating individuals over the Internet or 300 through the services of a participating health insurance agent. 301 Information about each product and service available through the 302 program must shall be made available through printed material 303 and an interactive Internet website. A participant needing 304 personal assistance to select products and services must shall 305 be referred to a participating agent in his or her area. 306 (a)âParticipation in the program may begin at any time 307 during a year after the employer completes enrollment and meets 308 the requirements specified by the corporation pursuant to 309 paragraph (4)(c). 310 (b)âInitial selection of products and services must be made 311 by an individual participant within the applicable open 312 enrollment period. 313 (c)âInitial enrollment periods for each product selected by 314 an individual participant must last at least 12 months, unless 315 the individual participant specifically agrees to a different 316 enrollment period. 317 (d)âIf an individual has selected one or more products and 318 enrolled in those products for at least 12 months or any other 319 period specifically agreed to by the individual participant, 320 changes in selected products and services may only be made 321 during the annual enrollment period established by the 322 corporation. 323 (e)âThe limits established in paragraphs (b)-(d) apply to 324 any risk-bearing product that promises future payment or 325 coverage for a variable amount of benefits or services. The 326 limits do not apply to initiation of flexible spending plans if 327 those plans are not associated with specific high-deductible 328 insurance policies or the use of spending accounts for any 329 products offering individual participants specific amounts and 330 types of health services and treatments at a contracted price. 331 (8)âCONSUMER INFORMATION.âThe corporation shall: 332 (a)âEstablish a secure website to facilitate the purchase 333 of products and services by participating individuals. The 334 website must provide information about each product or service 335 available through the program. 336 (b)âInform individuals about other public health care 337 programs. 338 (9)âRISK POOLING.âThe program may use methods for pooling 339 the risk of individual participants and preventing selection 340 bias. These methods may include, but are not limited to, a 341 postenrollment risk adjustment of the premium payments to the 342 vendors. The corporation may establish a methodology for 343 assessing the risk of enrolled individual participants based on 344 data reported annually by the vendors about their enrollees. 345 Distribution of payments to the vendors may be adjusted based on 346 the assessed relative risk profile of the enrollees in each 347 risk-bearing product for the most recent period for which data 348 is available. 349 (10)âEXEMPTION EXEMPTIONS.â 350 (a)âProducts, other than the products set forth in 351 subparagraphs (4)(d)1.-4., sold as part of the program are not 352 subject to the licensing requirements of the Florida Insurance 353 Code, as defined in s. 624.01 or the mandated offerings or 354 coverages established in part VI of chapter 627 and chapter 641. 355 (b)âThe corporation may act as an administrator as defined 356 in s. 626.88 but is not required to be certified pursuant to 357 part VII of chapter 626. However, a third party administrator 358 used by the corporation must be certified under part VII of 359 chapter 626. 360 (c)âAny standard forms, website design, or marketing 361 communication developed by the corporation and used by the 362 corporation, or any vendor that meets the requirements of 363 paragraph (4)(f) is not subject to the Florida Insurance Code, 364 as established in s. 624.01. 365 (10)âCORPORATION.âThere is created Florida Employee Health 366 Choices, Inc., which shall be registered, incorporated, 367 organized, and operated in compliance with part III of chapter 368 112 and chapters 119, 286, and 617. The purpose of the 369 corporation is to administer the program created in this section 370 and to conduct such other business as may further the 371 administration of the program. The Department of Management 372 Services shall facilitate the formation of the corporation and 373 provide administrative support for the corporation until January 374 1, 2029. The corporation must be self-sustaining and no longer 375 require administrative assistance from the Department of 376 Management Services by January 1, 2029. 377 (a)âThe corporation shall be governed by an eight-member 378 board of directors. Board members shall be appointed for terms 379 of up to 3 years and shall be eligible for reappointment. A 380 vacancy on the board shall be filled for the unexpired portion 381 of the term in the same manner as the original appointment. 382 Board members may not include an individual who is affiliated 383 with or employed by an eligible vendor or a subsidiary of an 384 eligible vendor. Board members shall serve without compensation, 385 but are entitled to receive, from funds of the corporation, 386 reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses as provided in s. 387 112.061. The membership of the board shall consist of: 388 1.âThree members appointed by the Governor. 389 2.âTwo members appointed by the President of the Senate. 390 3.âTwo members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 391 Representatives. 392 4.âThe Secretary of Management Services or a designee with 393 expertise in state employee benefits and procurement, as an ex 394 officio nonvoting member. 395 (b)âThe corporation may exercise all powers granted to it 396 under chapter 617 necessary to carry out the purposes of this 397 section, including, but not limited to, the power to receive and 398 accept grants, loans, or advances of funds from any public or 399 private agency and to receive and accept from any source 400 contributions of money, property, labor, or any other thing of 401 value to be held, used, and applied for the purposes of this 402 section. 403 (c)âThere is no liability on the part of, and a cause of 404 action may not arise against, any member of the board or its 405 employees or agents for any action taken by them in exercising 406 their powers and performing their duties under this section. 407 (d)âThe board shall develop and adopt bylaws and other 408 corporate procedures necessary for the operation of the 409 corporation and carrying out the purposes of this section. At a 410 minimum, the bylaws must: 411 1.âSpecify procedures for selection of officers and 412 qualifications for reappointment, provided that a board member 413 may not serve more than 9 consecutive years. 414 2.âRequire an annual membership meeting that provides an 415 opportunity for input and interaction with individual 416 participants in the program. 417 3.âSpecify policies and procedures regarding conflicts of 418 interest, including part III of chapter 112, which prohibit a 419 member from participating in any decision that would inure to 420 the benefit of the member or the organization that employs the 421 member. The policies and procedures must also require public 422 disclosure of the interest that prevents the member from 423 participating in a decision on a particular matter. 424 4.âSpecify procedures for adopting an annual budget. 425 5.âSpecify procedures for selecting a chief executive 426 officer for the corporation who shall be responsible for 427 securing staff and consultant services necessary for the 428 operation of the program as may be authorized by the 429 corporationâs operating budget. 430 (e)âThe corporation shall establish policies and procedures 431 for application, enrollment, plan administration, performance 432 monitoring, and consumer education, and other policies and 433 procedures necessary for the operation of the program, 434 including, but not limited to: 435 1.âCriteria for participation in the program and procedures 436 for determining the eligibility of employers, vendors, 437 individuals, and health insurance agents and employers to 438 participate in the program. 439 2.âExclusion of vendors pursuant to paragraph (4)(d). 440 3.âCollection of contributions from participating employers 441 and individuals. 442 4.âPayment of premiums and other appropriate disbursements 443 based on the selections of products and services by 444 participating individuals. 445 5.âDisenrollment of participating individuals based on 446 failure to pay the individualâs share of any contribution 447 required to maintain enrollment in selected products. 448 (f)âThe corporation shall procure a vendor to facilitate a 449 platform that streamlines the purchase of individual coverage 450 for employees enrolled in individual coverage health 451 reimbursement arrangements. 452 1.âWithin 90 days after the formation of the corporation, 453 the department shall, as directed by the board, issue an 454 invitation to negotiate to procure the vendor. Responsive 455 bidders must demonstrate the ability to establish a platform 456 fully operational for open enrollment by January 1, 2028, and 457 provide for initial, open, and special enrollment periods. 458 2.âThe department shall evaluate and score the procurement 459 bids, enter into negotiations at the direction of the board, and 460 make recommendations to the board related to the contract award. 461 The corporation shall select the vendor and execute the contract 462 within 180 days after the issuance of the invitation to 463 negotiate. 464 (g)âThe corporation shall develop and implement a plan for 465 promoting public awareness of and participation in the program 466 and shall establish a toll-free hotline to respond to requests 467 for assistance from employers and plan enrollees. 468 (h)âThe corporation may evaluate and implement additional 469 options for employer participation which conform with common 470 insurance practices. 471 (11)âCORPORATION.âThere is created the Florida Health 472 Choices, Inc., which shall be registered, incorporated, 473 organized, and operated in compliance with part III of chapter 474 112 and chapters 119, 286, and 617. The purpose of the 475 corporation is to administer the program created in this section 476 and to conduct such other business as may further the 477 administration of the program. 478 (a)âThe corporation shall be governed by a 15-member board 479 of directors consisting of: 480 1.âThree ex officio, nonvoting members to include: 481 a.âThe Secretary of Health Care Administration or a 482 designee with expertise in health care services. 483 b.âThe Secretary of Management Services or a designee with 484 expertise in state employee benefits. 485 c.âThe commissioner of the Office of Insurance Regulation 486 or a designee with expertise in insurance regulation. 487 2.âFour members appointed by and serving at the pleasure of 488 the Governor. 489 3.âFour members appointed by and serving at the pleasure of 490 the President of the Senate. 491 4.âFour members appointed by and serving at the pleasure of 492 the Speaker of the House of Representatives. 493 5.âBoard members may not include insurers, health insurance 494 agents or brokers, health care providers, health maintenance 495 organizations, prepaid service providers, or any other entity, 496 affiliate or subsidiary of eligible vendors. 497 (b)âMembers shall be appointed for terms of up to 3 years. 498 Any member is eligible for reappointment. A vacancy on the board 499 shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the 500 same manner as the original appointment. 501 (c)âThe board shall select a chief executive officer for 502 the corporation who shall be responsible for the selection of 503 such other staff as may be authorized by the corporationâs 504 operating budget as adopted by the board. 505 (d)âBoard members are entitled to receive, from funds of 506 the corporation, reimbursement for per diem and travel expenses 507 as provided by s. 112.061. No other compensation is authorized. 508 (e)âThere is no liability on the part of, and no cause of 509 action shall arise against, any member of the board or its 510 employees or agents for any action taken by them in the 511 performance of their powers and duties under this section. 512 (f)âThe board shall develop and adopt bylaws and other 513 corporate procedures as necessary for the operation of the 514 corporation and carrying out the purposes of this section. The 515 bylaws shall: 516 1.âSpecify procedures for selection of officers and 517 qualifications for reappointment, provided that no board member 518 shall serve more than 9 consecutive years. 519 2.âRequire an annual membership meeting that provides an 520 opportunity for input and interaction with individual 521 participants in the program. 522 3.âSpecify policies and procedures regarding conflicts of 523 interest, including the provisions of part III of chapter 112, 524 which prohibit a member from participating in any decision that 525 would inure to the benefit of the member or the organization 526 that employs the member. The policies and procedures shall also 527 require public disclosure of the interest that prevents the 528 member from participating in a decision on a particular matter. 529 (g)âThe corporation may exercise all powers granted to it 530 under chapter 617 necessary to carry out the purposes of this 531 section, including, but not limited to, the power to receive and 532 accept grants, loans, or advances of funds from any public or 533 private agency and to receive and accept from any source 534 contributions of money, property, labor, or any other thing of 535 value to be held, used, and applied for the purposes of this 536 section. 537 (h)âThe corporation shall: 538 1.âDetermine eligibility of employers, vendors, 539 individuals, and agents in accordance with subsection (4). 540 2.âEstablish procedures necessary for the operation of the 541 program, including, but not limited to, procedures for 542 application, enrollment, risk assessment, risk adjustment, plan 543 administration, performance monitoring, and consumer education. 544 3.âArrange for collection of contributions from 545 participating employers and individuals. 546 4.âArrange for payment of premiums and other appropriate 547 disbursements based on the selections of products and services 548 by the individual participants. 549 5.âEstablish criteria for disenrollment of participating 550 individuals based on failure to pay the individualâs share of 551 any contribution required to maintain enrollment in selected 552 products. 553 6.âEstablish criteria for exclusion of vendors pursuant to 554 paragraph (4)(d). 555 7.âDevelop and implement a plan for promoting public 556 awareness of and participation in the program. 557 8.âSecure staff and consultant services necessary to the 558 operation of the program. 559 9.âEstablish policies and procedures regarding 560 participation in the program for individuals, vendors, health 561 insurance agents, and employers. 562 10.âProvide for the operation of a toll-free hotline to 563 respond to requests for assistance. 564 11.âProvide for initial, open, and special enrollment 565 periods. 566 12.âEvaluate options for employer participation which may 567 conform with common insurance practices. 568 (11)(12)âREPORT.âBeginning in the 2027-2028 2009-2010 569 fiscal year, the corporation shall submit by February 1 an 570 annual report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and 571 the Speaker of the House of Representatives documenting the 572 corporationâs activities in compliance with the duties 573 delineated in this section. 574 (12)(13)âPROGRAM INTEGRITY.âTo ensure program integrity and 575 to safeguard the financial transactions made under the auspices 576 of the program, the corporation is authorized to establish 577 qualifying criteria and certification procedures for vendors, 578 require performance bonds or other guarantees of ability to 579 complete contractual obligations, monitor the performance of 580 vendors, and enforce the agreements of the program through 581 financial penalty or disqualification from the program. 582 (13)(14)âEXEMPTION FROM PUBLIC RECORDS REQUIREMENTS.â 583 (a)âDefinitions.âFor purposes of this subsection, the term: 584 1.ââBuyerâs representativeâ means a participating insurance 585 agent as described in paragraph (4)(g). 586 2.ââEnrolleeâ means an employer who is eligible to enroll 587 in the program pursuant to paragraph (4)(a). 588 3.ââParticipantâ means an individual who is eligible to 589 participate in the program pursuant to paragraph (4)(b). 590 4.ââProprietary confidential business informationâ means 591 information, regardless of form or characteristics, that is 592 owned or controlled by a vendor requesting confidentiality under 593 this section; that is intended to be and is treated by the 594 vendor as private in that the disclosure of the information 595 would cause harm to the business operations of the vendor; that 596 has not been disclosed unless disclosed pursuant to a statutory 597 provision, an order of a court or administrative body, or a 598 private agreement providing that the information may be released 599 to the public; and that is information concerning: 600 a.âBusiness plans. 601 b.âInternal auditing controls and reports of internal 602 auditors. 603 c.âReports of external auditors for privately held 604 companies. 605 d.âClient and customer lists. 606 e.âPotentially patentable material. 607 f.âA trade secret as defined in s. 688.002. 608 5.ââVendorâ means a participating insurer or other provider 609 of services as described in paragraph (4)(d). 610 (b)âPublic record exemptions.â 611 1.âPersonal identifying information of an enrollee or 612 participant who has applied for or participates in the Florida 613 Employee Health Choices Program is confidential and exempt from 614 s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 615 2.âClient and customer lists of a buyerâs representative 616 held by the corporation are confidential and exempt from s. 617 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 618 3.âProprietary confidential business information held by 619 the corporation is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 620 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 621 (c)âRetroactive application.âThe public record exemptions 622 provided for in paragraph (b) apply to information held by the 623 corporation before, on, or after the effective date of this 624 exemption. 625 (d)âAuthorized release.â 626 1.âUpon request, information made confidential and exempt 627 pursuant to this subsection must shall be disclosed to: 628 a.âAnother governmental entity in the performance of its 629 official duties and responsibilities. 630 b.âAny person who has the written consent of the program 631 applicant. 632 c.âThe Florida Kidcare program for the purpose of 633 administering the program authorized in ss. 409.810-409.821. 634 2.âParagraph (b) does not prohibit a participantâs legal 635 guardian from obtaining confirmation of coverage, dates of 636 coverage, the name of the participantâs health plan, and the 637 amount of premium being paid. 638 (e)âPenalty.âA person who knowingly and willfully violates 639 this subsection commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, 640 punishable as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 641 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 642 409.821, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 643 409.821âFlorida Kidcare program public records exemption.â 644 (2)(a)âUpon request, such information shall be disclosed 645 to: 646 1.âAnother governmental entity in the performance of its 647 official duties and responsibilities; 648 2.âThe Department of Revenue for purposes of administering 649 the state Title IV-D program; 650 3.âThe Florida Employee Health Choices, Inc., for the 651 purpose of administering the program authorized pursuant to s. 652 408.910; or 653 4.âAny person who has the written consent of the program 654 applicant. 655 Section 3.âSubsection (3) of section 409.9122, Florida 656 Statutes, is amended to read: 657 409.9122âMedicaid managed care enrollment; HIV/AIDS 658 patients; procedures; data collection; accounting; information 659 system; medical loss ratio.â 660 (3)âThe agency shall develop a process to enable any 661 recipient with access to employer-sponsored health care coverage 662 to opt out of all eligible plans in the Medicaid program and to 663 use Medicaid financial assistance to pay for the recipientâs 664 share of cost in any such employer-sponsored coverage. 665 Contingent on federal approval, the agency shall also enable 666 recipients with access to other insurance or related products 667 that provide access to health care services created pursuant to 668 state law, including any plan or product available pursuant to 669 the Florida Employee Health Choices Program or any health 670 exchange, to opt out. The amount of financial assistance 671 provided for each recipient may not exceed the amount of the 672 Medicaid premium that would have been paid to a plan for that 673 recipient. 674 Section 4.âSubsection (4) of section 409.977, Florida 675 Statutes, is amended to read: 676 409.977âEnrollment.â 677 (4)âThe agency shall develop a process to enable a 678 recipient with access to employer-sponsored health care coverage 679 to opt out of all managed care plans and to use Medicaid 680 financial assistance to pay for the recipientâs share of the 681 cost in such employer-sponsored coverage. The agency shall also 682 enable recipients with access to other insurance or related 683 products providing access to health care services created 684 pursuant to state law, including any product available under the 685 Florida Employee Health Choices Program, or any health exchange, 686 to opt out. The amount of financial assistance provided for each 687 recipient may not exceed the amount of the Medicaid premium that 688 would have been paid to a managed care plan for that recipient. 689 The agency shall require Medicaid recipients with access to 690 employer-sponsored health care coverage to enroll in that 691 coverage and use Medicaid financial assistance to pay for the 692 recipientâs share of the cost for such coverage. The amount of 693 financial assistance provided for each recipient may not exceed 694 the amount of the Medicaid premium that would have been paid to 695 a managed care plan for that recipient. The agency may exceed 696 this amount for a high-cost patient if it determines it would be 697 cost effective to do so. The agency shall annually, beginning 698 June 30, 2026, submit an annual report on the program to the 699 Legislature including, but not limited to, the level of 700 participation; participant demographics, income levels, type of 701 employer-based coverage, and amount of health care utilization; 702 and a cost-effectiveness analysis both in the aggregate and on 703 an individual patient basis. 704 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.